District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.86

Repealed

Articles of dissolution.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 216, ch. 269, § 86
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(gg), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-930j.
1981 Ed., § 29-386.
2001 Ed., § 29-101.86.